Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1801
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-1801 to 79-1852 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 1.